Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Champertous Sales

66-4-201. Champertous sales of pretended interest prohibited.

No person shall agree to buy, or to bargain or sell any pretended right or title in lands or tenements, or any interest in such pretended right or title.

Code 1858, § 1776 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 1); Shan., § 3171; Code 1932, § 7823; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-406.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Champerty and Maintenance, §§ 3, 5-7, 9, 10, 13; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 47; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 54.

Law Reviews.

Champerty as We Know It (R.D. Cox), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (1983).

66-4-202. Sale without possession.

Any such agreement, bargain, sale, promise, covenant or grant shall be utterly void where the seller has not personally, or by the seller's agent or tenant, or the seller's ancestor, been in actual possession of the lands or tenements, or of the reversion or remainder, or taken the rents or profits for one (1) whole year next before the sale.

Code 1858, § 1777 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 1); Shan. § 3172; Code 1932, § 7824; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-407.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Champerty and Maintenance, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Champerty — Land Conveyed While in Adverse Possession, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 719 (1939).

66-4-203. Dismissal of suit on disclosure of facts.

Any suit at law or equity brought for the recovery of the lands or tenements bargained or contracted for, whether the agreement, sale, bargain, covenant, grant, or promise be executed or executory, shall be forthwith dismissed, with costs, by the court in which such suit may be pending, upon the facts being disclosed.

Code 1858, § 1778 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 1); Shan., § 3173; Code 1932, § 7825; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-408; modified.

66-4-204. Bona fide sales unimpaired.

This part shall not prevent an absolute and bona fide sale or mortgage of lands or tenements not possessed and held adversely at the time of such sale or mortgage; nor a sale by execution; nor a sale and conveyance by a nonresident of this state, of lands which such nonresident may own, and of which lands no person, at the time of such sale, holds adverse possession by deed, devise, or inheritance.

Code 1858, § 1779 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 1); Shan., § 3174; Code 1932, § 7826; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-409.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Champerty and Maintenance, § 9; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 47.

66-4-205. Presumption of champerty from sale of land adversely held by another.

If any person sells any lands or tenements, not having possession of them personally or by agent or tenant, the same being adversely held by color of title, champerty shall be presumed until the purchaser shows that such sale was bona fide made.

Code 1858, § 1780 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 1); Shan., § 3175; Code 1932, § 7827; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-410.

Cross-References. Adverse possession, limitations, §28-2-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Champerty and Maintenance, §§ 3, 5, 6, 7, 9, 13; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 47; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 54.